Washington statutes.
RCW 2.06.030

General powers and authority—Transfers of cases—Appellate jurisdiction, exceptions—Appeals.

The administration and procedures of the court shall be as provided by rules of the supreme court. The court shall be vested with all power and authority, not inconsistent with said rules, necessary to carry into complete execution all of its judgments, decrees and determinations in all matters within its jurisdiction, according to the rules and principles of the common law and the Constitution and laws of this state.

For the prompt and orderly administration of justice, the supreme court may (1) transfer to the appropriate division of the court for decision a case or appeal pending before the supreme court; or (2) transfer to the supreme court for decision a case or appeal pending in a division of the court.

Subject to the provisions of this section, the court shall have exclusive appellate jurisdiction in all cases except:

(a) cases of quo warranto, prohibition, injunction or mandamus directed to state officials;

(b) criminal cases where the death penalty has been decreed;

(c) cases where the validity of all or any portion of a statute, ordinance, tax, impost, assessment or toll is drawn into question on the grounds of repugnancy to the Constitution of the United States or of the state of Washington, or to a statute or treaty of the United States, and the superior court has held against its validity;

(d) cases involving fundamental and urgent issues of broad public import requiring prompt and ultimate determination; and

(e) cases involving substantive issues on which there is a direct conflict among prevailing decisions of panels of the court or between decisions of the supreme court;

all of which shall be appealed directly to the supreme court: PROVIDED, That whenever a majority of the court before which an appeal is pending, but before a hearing thereon, is in doubt as to whether such appeal is within the categories set forth in subsection (d) or (e) of this section, the cause shall be certified to the supreme court for such determination.

The appellate jurisdiction of the court of appeals does not extend to civil actions at law for the recovery of money or personal property when the original amount in controversy, or the value of the property does not exceed the sum of two hundred dollars.

The court shall have appellate jurisdiction over review of final decisions of administrative agencies certified by the superior court pursuant to RCW 34.05.518.

Appeals from the court to the supreme court shall be only at the discretion of the supreme court upon the filing of a petition for review. No case, appeal or petition for a writ filed in the supreme court or the court shall be dismissed for the reason that it was not filed in the proper court, but it shall be transferred to the proper court.

[ 1980 c 76 s 3; 1979 c 102 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 221 s 3.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. Titles 1 and 4 RAP, RAP 18.22.

Severability—1979 c 102: See note following RCW 3.66.020.